Massachusetts, session 194th, H4173.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. The first sentence of Section 3 of Chapter 52 of the Acts and Resolves of 
1890 is hereby amended to delete the word “nine” and replace with the word “twelve.” 
SECTION 2. Chapter 52 of the Acts and Resolves of 1890 is hereby further amended to 
insert the following sentence after the first sentence in Section 3: “Three of the trustees elected 
shall be those elected as Citizens’ Library Trustees.” 
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.